Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.054

Indictment or information—Certainty.

The indictment or information must be direct and certain as it regards:

(1) The party charged;

(2) The crime charged; and

(3) The particular circumstances of the crime charged, when they are necessary to constitute a complete crime.

[ 1891 c 28 s 22; Code 1881 s 1006; 1873 p 225 s 189; 1869 p 241 s 184; 1854 p 112 s 61; RRS s 2057. Formerly RCW 10.37.050, part.]